District of Columbia statutes.
44-110.09

Kitchen.

An ALR shall provide a kitchen that has the following:

(1)

Storage, refrigerator, or freezer space for perishable and nonperishable foods;

(2)

Food preparation areas with cleanable surfaces;

(3)

Equipment to prepare and serve food at safe and palatable temperatures; and

(4)

Sufficient equipment and staffing to be in compliance with section 1116 of Title 14 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations, as those regulations are applicable to boarding houses.

History

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 1009, 47 DCR 2647